Florida, session 2026, SB1204.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âPresent subsection (4) of section 1003.457, 20 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (5), a new 21 subsection (4) is added to that section, and subsection (1) of 22 that section is amended, to read: 23 1003.457âCardiac emergencies, and automated external 24 defibrillators, and bleeding control kits on school grounds.â 25 (1)âEach public school shall develop a plan for urgent 26 life-saving emergencies (PULSE) that addresses the appropriate 27 use of school personnel to respond to incidents involving an 28 individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest, severe bleeding, 29 or a similar life-threatening emergency while on school grounds. 30 Each PULSE must integrate evidence-based core elements and 31 consider those elements recommended by the American Heart 32 Association for schools responding to cardiac emergencies. 33 (4)(a)âNo later than July 1, 2028, each public school, 34 including charter schools, must have bleeding control kits on 35 school grounds. Each bleeding control kit must be available in a 36 clearly marked and publicized location. Schools must maintain 37 the bleeding control kits according to the manufacturerâs 38 recommendations. The Department of Education shall establish 39 guidelines for determining the number of bleeding control kits 40 each school is required to have pursuant to this subsection. 41 (b)âAppropriate staff, as determined by the department, 42 must receive training in the use of bleeding control kits. 43 (c)âBleeding control kits and the use of such kits must be 44 integrated into the appropriate emergency drills under s. 45 1006.07(4). 46 (d)âUpon the use of a bleeding control kit, the kit must be 47 restocked and used items must be replaced. 48 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.